Washington statutes.
RCW 1.16.020

"Fiscal biennium."

The fiscal biennium of the state shall commence on the first day of July in each odd-numbered year and end on the thirtieth day of June of the next succeeding odd-numbered year. The fiscal biennium of those cities and towns which utilize a biennial budget shall commence on the first day of January in each odd-numbered year and end on the thirty-first day of December of the next succeeding even-numbered year.

[ 1985 c 175 s 2; 1953 c 184 s 2; 1923 c 86 s 1; RRS s 10927.]

NOTES:

Biennial reports: RCW 43.01.035.

Municipal biennial budgets: Chapters 35.34 and 35A.34 RCW.